Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.370

Payment of compensation.

From time to time, the superior judge of the county shall certify the amount due any such bailiff, and order the payment thereof; and thereupon the county auditor shall issue to such bailiff a warrant on the county treasurer, payable out of the general fund [current expense fund], for the amount so certified.

[ 1891 c 10 s 2; RRS s 10975.]